Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 2. Grand Teton National Park

§ 36-10-201.
Present funds to be paid to treasurer of Teton county.

All funds now held by the treasurer of the state of Wyoming, which have been received by the state of Wyoming from the United States under Public Law 787-81st congress (which is known as an act to establish a new Grand Teton National Park in the state of Wyoming, and for other purposes) [16 U.S.C. § 406d-1 et seq.] shall be immediately paid by the state treasurer to the treasurer of Teton county, Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 84, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 36-212.

Public Law 787. —

Public Law 787 of the 81st congress, referred to in this section, appears as 16 U.S.C. § 406d-1 et seq.

§ 36-10-202.
Subsequent funds received to be paid to treasurer of Teton county.

All funds hereafter received by the state of Wyoming from the United States under aforesaid act [Public Law 787-81st Congress] shall be paid by the state treasurer to the treasurer of Teton county, Wyoming, as soon as received.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 84, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 36-213.

§ 36-10-203.
Crediting and distribution of funds received by treasurer of Teton county.

The treasurer of Teton county, Wyoming, shall credit all funds so received to the various tax districts of said county in the proportion that the assessed valuation each tax district bears to the total assessed valuation of the county; and shall distribute the funds so credited to the various funds of the tax districts in accordance with the distribution chart of the year in which such funds are received by the county treasurer. Provided, that the state of Wyoming shall each year receive from Teton county the same proportion of said funds and in the same manner as if such funds had been received by Teton county in payment of taxes.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 84, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 36-214.